Vermont, session 2025-2026, H312.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 161 is amended to read:
§ 161. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION; APPOINTMENT OF
MEMBERS; TERM; VACANCY
The State Board shall consist of ten 10 members, of which expertise or
experience as a principal, superintendent, teacher, school board member,
educator preparation program provider, special education provider, and parent
shall be represented by at least one member each. Two of the members shall
be secondary students enrolled in a public school, approved independent
school, or secondary career technical education center, one of whom shall be a
full member and the other of whom shall be a junior member who may not
vote. All members shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and
consent of the Senate. In the appointment of the nonstudent members, priority
shall be given to the selection of persons with a demonstrated commitment to
ensuring quality education for Vermont students. To the extent possible, the
members shall represent the State’s geographic, gender, racial, and ethnic
diversity and shall also be proportionally representative of the number of
students educated in public schools and independent schools. The Secretary
shall serve on the State Board as a nonvoting member. The members shall be
appointed as follows:
VT LEG #378672 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.312
2025 Page 3 of 8
(1) Four members shall be appointed by the Governor, including the
secondary student members.
(2) Three members shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on
Committees, none of whom may be legislators. Members shall be chosen from
among not fewer than six candidates proposed by the Senate Committee on
Education.
(3) Three members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House,
none of whom may be legislators. Members shall be chosen from among not
fewer than six candidates proposed by the House Committee on Education.
(4) Upon the expiration of the respective terms of those members of the
Board previously appointed, excluding the student members, the Governor
appointing authority that made the initial appointment to the expired term
shall, biennially in the month of February with the advice and consent of the
Senate, appoint members for terms of six years. The terms shall begin March
1 of the year in which the appointments are made. A member serving a term of
six years shall not be eligible for reappointment for successive terms.
(2)(5) In the event of any vacancy occurring in the membership of the
Board, the Governor appointing authority that made the initial appointment to
the vacated term shall fill the vacancy within 60 days with a qualified person
whose appointment shall be for the unexpired portion of the term. Vacancies
in terms initially filled by the Senate Committee on Committees or the Speaker
VT LEG #378672 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.312
2025 Page 4 of 8
of the House shall be filled by choosing from among the original list of
candidates for the vacant term proposed by the applicable committee of
jurisdiction.
(3)(6) Biennially, the Board shall choose a member of the Board to be
its chair.
(4)(7) Annually, using an application process that is open and accessible
to all eligible students, the Governor shall appoint a Vermont secondary school
student who will continue to be a secondary student for at least two years
following taking office, to serve on the State Board for two years, beginning on
July 1 of the year of appointment. The student member shall not vote during
the first year and shall be a full and voting member during the second year of
his or her the student’s term.
Sec. 2. TRANSITION PERIOD APPOINTMENTS
Members currently serving on the State Board of Education may continue to
serve for the duration of the term to which they were appointed. Beginning on
July 1, 2025, as terms of currently serving members expire, appointments of
successors shall be made in accordance with the qualifications and
considerations required under 16 V.S.A. § 161 and shall be made in the
following order:
VT LEG #378672 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.312
2025 Page 5 of 8
(1) For the terms expiring on February 28, 2027, one appointment shall
be made by the Senate Committee on Committees; one shall be made by the
Speaker of the House; and one shall be made by the Governor.
(2) For the term expiring on February 28, 2028, the appointment shall be
made by the Senate Committee on Committees.
(3) For the term expiring on February 28, 2029, the appointment shall be
made by the Speaker of the House.
(4) For the term expiring on June 30, 2030, the appointment shall be
made by the Governor.
(5) For the terms expiring on February 28, 2031, one shall be made by
the Senate Committee on Committees and one shall be made by the Speaker of
the House.
(6) The Governor shall continue to make annual secondary student
appointments in accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 161.
(7) After each appointing authority has made its initial transition period
appointments under this section, all appointments shall be made by the
appointing authority that made the initial appointment to the vacated or expired
term in accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 161.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. chapter 11 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 11. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES GENERALLY
* * *
VT LEG #378672 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.312
2025 Page 6 of 8
§ 256. TERM OF OFFICER APPOINTED WITH ADVICE AND CONSENT
OF SENATE
(a) Whenever it is provided by law that an office shall be filled by
appointment with the advice and consent of the Senate, such appointment shall
be made during the month of February, and the term of office of a person an
individual so appointed shall commence on the first day of March thereafter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all secretaries of State
agencies and all commissioners of State departments shall take office only with
the advice and consent of the Senate, except in the case of an appointment to
fill a vacancy when the General Assembly is not in session, in which case the
appointee may take office subject to the provisions of section 257 of this title.
§ 257. APPOINTMENTS AND VACANCIES REQUIRING ADVICE AND
CONSENT OF SENATE
(a) Appointments required to be made pursuant to section 256 of this title
in the month of February, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall be
valid if made and confirmed at any time during the then regular biennial
session of the General Assembly. If not made and confirmed in such month of
February, the term of office of the person individual appointed and confirmed
thereafter shall extend to and include the day whereon his or her the
individual’s term would expire had he or she the individual been appointed and
confirmed in such month of February.
VT LEG #378672 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.312
2025 Page 7 of 8
(b) When a vacancy occurs in an office requiring appointment with the
advice and consent of the Senate, an appointment may be made to fill the
vacancy.
(1) If the appointment to fill the vacancy is made during any
adjournment of the General Assembly, the person individual appointed may
validly function in that office during adjournment until the Senate convenes at
the next regular, adjourned, or special session and acts upon the appointment
submitted forthwith by the Governor; or if.
(2) If the appointment to fill the vacancy is made during any session of
the General Assembly, the person individual appointed may validly function in
that office until the Senate shall act upon the appointment submitted forthwith
by the Governor. Thereafter the
(c)(1) An appointee shall continue in office if the Senate consents to the
appointment.
(2) If the Senate, by vote, does not consent to the appointment, the
Governor shall be prohibited from appointing the same individual for the same
office, including on an interim basis, for the duration of the Governor’s term of
office, and that same individual shall be prohibited from serving in an acting or
interim capacity in that same office.
* * *
VT LEG #378672 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.312
2025 Page 8 of 8
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 2702 is amended to read:
§ 2702. SECRETARY OF EDUCATION
(a) With the advice and consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint a
Secretary of Education from among no not fewer than three candidates
proposed by the State Board of Education. The State Board shall begin a
robust national search process not later than 45 days after public notification of
the resignation of a Secretary of Education. The Secretary shall serve at the
pleasure of the Governor.
(b) The Secretary shall report directly to the Governor and shall be a
member of the Governor’s Cabinet.
(c) At the time of appointment, the Secretary shall have expertise in
education management and policy and demonstrated leadership and
management abilities.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378672 v.1